Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3203
Prohibited acts; exceptions.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or in section 60-3204, the use of an automatic license plate reader system by a governmental entity is prohibited.

(2) An automatic license plate reader system may be used when such use is:

(a) By a law enforcement agency of a governmental entity for the purpose of identifying:

(i) Outstanding parking or traffic violations;

(ii) An unregistered or uninsured vehicle;

(iii) A vehicle in violation of the vehicle equipment requirements set forth under the Nebraska Rules of the Road;

(iv) A vehicle in violation of any other vehicle registration requirement;

(v) A vehicle registered to an individual for whom there is an outstanding warrant;

(vi) A vehicle associated with a missing person;

(vii) A vehicle that has been reported as stolen; or

(viii) A vehicle that is relevant and material to an ongoing criminal investigation;

(b) By a parking enforcement entity for regulating the use of a parking facility;

(c) For the purpose of controlling access to a secured area;

(d) For the purpose of electronic toll collection; or

(e) To assist weighing stations in performing their duties under section 60-1301.

Laws 2018, LB93, § 3.

Nebraska Rules of the Road, see section 60-601.